Wisconsin, session 2025, AB236.
do enact as follows:AB236,11Section 1. 165.776 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB236,2,32165.776 (1) (d) “Sexual assault kit” means the evidence collected from a 3sexual assault forensic examination has the meaning given in s. 165.775 (1) (e).AB236,24Section 2. 950.04 (1v) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:AB236,2,65950.04 (1v) (dm) If he or she provided a sexual assault kit, as defined in s. 6165.775 (1) (e), to all of the following:AB236,2,871. To have his or her sexual assault kit tested in accordance with the timeline 8established under s. 165.775 (4) (b).AB236,2,1492. To be provided, upon request and in a manner designated by the victim, 10information regarding the location, testing date, and testing results of the sexual 11assault kit; whether a deoxyribonucleic acid analysis has been performed on the kit 12and, if an analysis has, whether or not a deoxyribonucleic acid profile has been 13developed and whether a comparison of the profile to profiles of known persons has 14identified a person; and the estimated destruction date of the sexual assault kit.AB236,2,16153. To be informed of any change in the status of his or her case, including if the 16case has been closed or reopened.AB236,2,1717